Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1909YH (4) 91 jm/jh H.F. 966 Section 1. Section 423.3, subsection 57, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 The sales price from all sales of food and food ingredients 3 including dietary supplements . However, as used in this 4 subsection , a sale of âfood and food ingredientsâ does not 5 include a sale of alcoholic beverages , or candy , or dietary 6 supplements ; food sold through vending machines; or sales of 7 prepared food, soft drinks, or tobacco. For the purposes of 8 this subsection : 9